Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.140

Operating without license—Penalty.

Any person operating or maintaining any assisted living facility without a license under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and each day of a continuing violation shall be considered a separate offense.

[ 2012 c 10 s 9; 1957 c 253 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.